Washington statutes.
RCW 35.73.080

Provisions not exclusive.

The provisions and remedies provided by this chapter for filling lowlands in connection with establishing street grades or for sanitary reasons are cumulative.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.73.080. Prior: 1907 c 243 s 6; RRS s 9431.]